Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 5 SPECIAL IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS IN MUNICIPALITIES
31-25-519. Statement of expenses - apportionment.

Upon completion of any local improvement or upon completion from time to time of any part thereof and upon acceptance thereof by the governing body or when the total cost of any improvement or of any such part thereof can be reasonably ascertained, either prior to, during, or subsequent to the construction of the improvements, the governing body shall cause to be prepared a statement showing the whole cost of the improvement, including costs of inspection and collection, capitalized interest on any bonds for such period as the governing body may deem necessary, capitalized bond reserves, and all other incidental costs, the portion thereof, if any, to be paid by the municipality, and the portion thereof to be assessed upon each lot or tract of land to be assessed for the same, which statement shall be filed in the office of the clerk. If the governing body determines that the basis of assessment is inequitable in any case, a just and equitable assessment shall be made upon the basis of benefits accruing to the property assessed by reason of the improvements made.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1195, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1048, § 7, effective July 1.

31-25-520. Notice of hearing on assessments.

The clerk shall give notice that the assessment roll has been completed and of a hearing on the assessment roll by publication in an issue of a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality, the publication to be at least fifteen days prior to the date of hearing. The same notice of the hearing shall be mailed by first-class mail to each property owner to be assessed for the cost of the improvements who is included within the district. The mailed notice shall be made on or about the date of the publication of the notice of hearing. The notices shall specify: The whole cost of the improvement; the portion, if any, to be paid by such municipality; the share apportioned to each lot or tract of land; that any complaints or objections that may be made in writing by the property owners or any citizen to the governing body, and filed in writing on or prior to the date of the hearing, will be heard and determined by the governing body before the passage of any ordinance assessing the cost of said improvements; and the date when and the place where such complaints or objections will be heard.

Any district formed for the purpose of encouraging, accommodating, and financing improvements as authorized in section 31-25-502 (2) shall not be required to provide a notice of the hearing on assessments by publication; rather, such notice, if any, may be provided in the time and manner set forth in the contract or agreement entered into by the owner for each property included in the district.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1196, § 1, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1280, § 3, effective May 22.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1303, § 27, effective May 27.

31-25-521. Hearing on objections.

At the time specified in said notice or at some adjourned time, the governing body shall hear and determine all such complaints and objections and may make such modifications and changes as may seem equitable and just or may confirm the first apportionment. The governing body shall by ordinance assess the cost of said improvements, and the passage of such ordinance shall be prima facie evidence of the fact that the property assessed is benefited in the amount of the assessments and that such assessments have been lawfully levied.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1196, § 1, effective July 1.

31-25-522. Assessment of lien - filing with county clerk and recorder - corrections.

All assessments made in pursuance of this part 5, together with all interest thereon and penalties for default in payment thereof and all costs in collecting the same, shall constitute, from the date of the final publication of the assessing ordinance, a perpetual lien in the several amounts assessed against each lot or tract of land and shall have priority over all other liens except general tax liens. As to any subdivisions of any land assessed in pursuance of this part 5, the assessment lien may be apportioned by the governing body in such manner, if any, as may be provided in the assessing ordinance.

The clerk shall file copies of the assessing ordinance after its final adoption by the governing body with the county clerk and recorder of the county wherein each lot or tract of land assessed is located for recording on the land records of such lots or tracts of land, as provided in article 30, 35, or 36 of title 38, C.R.S. In addition, the clerk shall also file copies of such assessing ordinance after its adoption by the governing body with the county treasurer and the county assessor. The county assessor is authorized to create separate schedules for each lot or tract of land assessed within the municipality pursuant to the ordinance.

No delays, mistakes, errors, or irregularities in any act or proceeding authorized or required by this part 5 shall prejudice or invalidate any final assessment; but the same may be remedied by subsequent filings, amending acts, or proceedings, as the case may require. When so remedied, the same shall take effect as of the date of the original filing, act, or proceeding.

To provide for unanticipated increases in the costs of improvements, the amount of any assessment imposed before the completion of the related improvements may be increased to a total amount not in excess of the special benefit conferred upon the affected property if, not more than ninety days following the completion of such improvements, the governing body gives notice of its intent to consider the amendment of such assessment, stating the time and place that a public hearing shall be held thereon, and holds such public hearing, in the same manner as provided for hearings held pursuant to sections 31-25-520 and 31-25-521. At the conclusion of such public hearing, the governing body may determine whether to amend one or more assessments within a district. Any such amendment shall take effect as of the date of the original assessment.

If, as the result of any subdivision, resubdivision, vacation of right-of-way, or other action taken subsequent to the adoption of the assessment ordinance, any new lot or parcel is created within a district, the governing body may, without a public hearing and with the consent of the owner of the new lot or parcel, modify the assessment ordinance to reapportion all or any part of the total amount assessed in the district to such new lot or parcel.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1196, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1055, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(2) amended, p. 1432, § 18, effective June 11.

L. 90:

(2) amended, p. 1473, § 8, effective October 1.

L. 2008:

(4) and (5) added, p. 1303, § 28, effective May 27.

31-25-523. Assessment roll.

The clerk shall prepare a local assessment roll in book form showing in suitable columns each piece of land assessed, the total amount of assessment, the amount of each installment of principal and interest if, in pursuance of this part 5, the same is payable in installments, and the date when each installment will become due. The assessment roll shall have suitable columns for use in case of payment of the whole amount or of any installment or penalty. The clerk shall deliver the assessment roll, duly certified, under the corporate seal, to the municipal treasurer for collection.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1197, § 1, effective July 1.

31-25-524. Payment - assessment roll returned.

Payment may be made to the municipal treasurer at any time within thirty days after the final publication of the assessing ordinance.

At the expiration of said thirty-day period, the municipal treasurer shall return the local assessment roll to the clerk, therein showing all payments made with the date of each payment. Said roll shall thereafter be certified by the clerk under the seal of the municipality and delivered by him to the county treasurer of the same county with his warrant for the collection of the same. The county treasurer shall receipt for the same, and all such rolls shall be numbered for convenient reference.

If the municipal treasurer is directed by ordinance to collect assessment payments as provided in section 31-25-526 (1), in lieu of the procedure specified in subsection (2) of this section, the municipal treasurer may keep the assessment roll, numbered for convenient reference, in such a manner as to best facilitate the collection and recording of assessment payments.

All special assessments for local improvements authorized in section 31-25-502 (2) may be due and payable at such alternate time or times as set forth in the assessing ordinance.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1197, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entitle section amended, p. 1049, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(1) amended, p. 1474, § 9, effective October 1.

L. 2008:

(4) added, p. 1304, § 29, effective May 27.

31-25-525. Owner of interest may pay share.

The owner of any divided or undivided interest in the property assessed may pay his share of any assessment upon producing evidence of the extent of his interest satisfactory to the treasurer having charge of the roll.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1197, § 1, effective July 1.

31-25-526. Collection of assessment payments - by municipal treasurer - by county treasurer.

The governing body may, by ordinance, direct the municipal treasurer to collect any amount payable as an assessment pursuant to this part 5 or authorize the municipal treasurer or other appropriate municipal official to enter into contracts with third parties for assistance in the administration and collection of assessments. If the governing body does not direct, by ordinance, that assessment payments be collected by the municipal treasurer, then such payments shall be collected by the county treasurer.

All collections made by the county treasurer upon an assessment roll in any calendar month shall be accounted for and paid over to the municipal treasurer on or before the tenth day of the next succeeding calendar month, with separate statements for all such collections for each improvement.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1197, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1049, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 1304, § 30, effective May 27.

31-25-527. When assessments payable - installments.

All special assessments for local improvements shall be due and payable within thirty days after the final publication of the assessing ordinance without demand; but all such assessments may be paid, at the election of the owner, in installments with interest as provided in section 31-25-528. All special assessments for local improvements authorized in section 31-25-502 (2) may be due and payable at such alternate time or times as set forth in the assessing ordinance.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1197, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1304, § 31, effective May 27.

31-25-528. How installments paid - interest.

In case of such election to pay in installments, the assessments shall be payable in two or more installments of principal with interest in all cases on the unpaid principal. The first installment shall be payable as prescribed by the governing body in not more than five years, and the last installment shall be payable in not more than twenty years. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the number, amounts, and times of payment of installments, the period of payment, and the rate and times of payment of interest shall be determined by the governing body and set forth in the assessing ordinance. If assessments are to be collected by the county treasurer, the times of payment of installments shall be the same as the times of payment of installments of property taxes as specified in section 39-10-104.5 (2), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1197, § 1, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1280, § 4, effective May 22.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1050, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1474, § 10, effective October 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 2184, § 64, effective June 2.

31-25-529. Effect of payment in installments.

Failure to pay the whole assessment within said period of thirty days shall be conclusively considered to be an election on the part of all persons interested, whether under disability or otherwise, to pay in installments. All persons so electing to pay in installments shall be conclusively considered to have consented to said improvements. Such election shall be conclusively considered to be a waiver of any right to question the power or jurisdiction of the municipality to construct the improvements, the quality of the work, the regularity or sufficiency of the proceedings, the validity or the correctness of the assessments, or the validity of the lien thereof; except that, with respect to local improvements authorized in section 31-25-502 (2), the owner for each property included in the district shall retain all rights otherwise existing by contract or by law against parties other than the county with respect to the financed energy efficiency improvement or renewable energy improvement.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1197, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1304, § 32, effective May 27.

31-25-530. Penalty for default - payment of balance.

Failure to pay any installment, whether of principal or interest, when due shall cause the whole of the unpaid principal to become due and collectible immediately, and the whole amount of the unpaid principal and accrued interest shall thereafter draw interest at the rate established pursuant to section 5-12-106 (2) and (3), C.R.S., until the day of sale; but, at any time prior to the day of sale, the owner may pay the amount of all unpaid installments, with interest at the penalty rate set by the assessing ordinance, and all penalties and costs of collection accrued and shall thereupon be restored to the right thereafter to pay in installments in the same manner as if default had not been suffered. The owner of any property not in default as to any installment or payment may, at any time, pay the whole of the unpaid principal with the interest accruing to the maturity of the next installment of interest or principal; except that any owner who pays the whole of the unpaid balance pursuant to this section may be assessed a prepayment premium not to exceed three percent of the unpaid principal, the amount of which premium shall be specified in the ordinance imposing the assessment.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1198, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1057, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 274, § 15, effective August 7.

31-25-531. Sale of property for nonpayment.

The county treasurer or the municipal treasurer pursuant to section 31-25-526 shall receive payment of all assessments appearing upon the assessment roll with interest.

In case of default in the payment of any installment of principal or interest on assessed property when due:

The municipal treasurer, if collecting assessment payments pursuant to section 31-25-526, shall certify to the county treasurer the whole amount of the unpaid assessments; and

The county treasurer shall advertise and sell all property concerning which such default is suffered for the payment of the whole of the unpaid assessments thereon, plus penalties and costs of collection.

Said advertisements and sales shall be made at the same times, in the same manner, under all the same conditions and penalties, and with the same effect as provided by general law for sales of real estate in default of payment of the general property tax.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1198, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1049, § 10, effective July 1.

31-25-532. Municipality may purchase property on default.

At any sale by the county treasurer of any property for the purpose of paying any special assessment for local improvements made under the provisions of this part 5, the municipal treasurer, having written authority from the governing body, may purchase any such property without paying for the same in cash and shall receive certificates of purchase therefor in the name of the municipality. The certificates shall be received and credited at their face value, with all interest and penalties accrued, on account of the assessments in pursuance of which the sale was made. The certificates may thereafter be sold by the municipal treasurer at their face value, with all interest and penalties accrued, and assigned by him to the purchaser in the name of the municipality. The proceeds of such sale shall be credited to the fund created by ordinance for the payment of such assessments respectively. In the event that all bonded indebtedness incurred in payment for said local improvements has been discharged in full, said certificates may be sold by the governing body for the best price obtainable at public sale, at auction, or by sealed bids in the same manner and under the same conditions as is provided in subsection (3) of this section. The proceeds shall be credited to the general fund of said municipality or to the special surplus and deficiency fund provided for by section 31-25-534 (2), as the circumstances may require. Such assignments shall be without recourse, and the sale and assignments shall operate as a lien in favor of the purchaser and assignee as is provided by law in the case of sale of real estate in default of payment of the general property tax.

Any municipality as such purchaser has the right to apply for tax deeds on such certificates of purchase at any time after three years from the date of issuance of said certificates, and such deeds shall be issued as provided by law for issuance of tax deeds for the nonpayment of the general property tax.

Cumulatively with all other remedies, any municipality which is the owner of property by virtue of a tax deed, or is the owner of property otherwise acquired, in satisfaction or discharge of the liens represented by such certificates of sale, may sell such property for the best price obtainable at public sale, at auction, or by sealed bids. Such sales shall be after public notice by the municipal treasurer or clerk to all persons having or claiming any interest in the property to be sold or in the proceeds of such sale by publication of such notice three times, a week apart, in a weekly or daily newspaper of general circulation within the county in which the property is located. Such notice shall describe the property and state the time, place, and manner of receiving bids; except that the time fixed for the sale shall not be less than ten days after the last publication. The municipality may reject any and all bids. Any interested party, at any time within ten days after the receipt of bids for the sale of property, may file with the municipality a written protest as to the sufficiency of the amount of any bid made or the validity of the proceedings for the sale. If the protest is denied, such person, within ten days thereafter, shall commence an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin or restrain the municipality from completing the sale. If no such action is commenced, all protests or objections to the sale shall be waived and the municipality shall then convey the property to the successful bidder by quitclaim deed.

In addition to all other remedies, any municipality which is a holder of certificates of purchase may bring a civil action for foreclosure thereof in accordance with article 38 of title 38, C.R.S., joining as defendants all persons holding record title, persons occupying or in possession of the property, persons having or claiming any interest in the property or in the proceeds of foreclosure sale, all governmental taxing units having taxes or other claims against said property, and all unknown persons having or claiming any interest in said property. Any number of certificates may be foreclosed in the same proceeding. In such proceeding the municipality, as plaintiff, is entitled to all relief provided by law in actions for an adjudication of rights with respect to real property, including actions to quiet title.

The proceeds of any such sale of property shall be credited to the appropriate special assessment fund. The municipality shall deduct therefrom the necessary expenses in securing deeds and taking proceedings for the sale or foreclosure.

When any municipality has sold or conveyed at a fair market value certificates of purchase or property which it has acquired in satisfaction or discharge of special assessment liens, such sales and conveyances are hereby validated and confirmed as against all parties having or claiming any interest in such property or the proceeds of such sale.

It is hereby declared that the purpose of this section is to restore delinquent property to the tax rolls and to realize the greatest possible amount from such property for the benefit of all persons and taxing bodies having liens thereon.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1198, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 1615, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1) amended, p. 1051, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(4) amended, p. 82, § 3, effective March 26.

31-25-533. Power of governing body to contract debt - question submitted to registered electors.

The governing body has power to contract an indebtedness on behalf of the municipality and upon the credit thereof by borrowing money or issuing the negotiable interest-bearing bonds of the municipality for the purpose of providing a fund to pay such part of the cost of said improvements as may be determined by the governing body. No such indebtedness shall be created except by ordinance subject to and otherwise in accordance with the provisions of section 31-15-302 (1)(d).

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1199, § 1, effective July 1.

31-25-534. Issuing bonds - property specially benefited.

For the purpose of paying all or such portion of the cost of any improvement constructed under this part 5 as may be assessed against the property specially benefited, special assessment bonds of the municipality may be issued of such date, in such form, and on such terms, including, without limitation, provisions for their sale, payment, and redemption, as may be prescribed by the governing body, bearing the name of the street, alley, or district improved and payable in a sufficient period of years after such date to cover the period of payment provided and in convenient denominations. All such bonds shall be issued upon estimates approved by the governing body, and the municipal treasurer shall preserve a record of the same in a suitable book kept for that purpose. All such bonds shall be subscribed by the mayor, countersigned by the municipal treasurer, with the corporate seal thereto affixed, and attested by the clerk. Such bonds shall be payable out of the moneys collected on account of the assessments made for said improvements, from reserve accounts, if any, established to secure payment of such bonds, and from any other legally available moneys. Whenever three-fourths of the bonds for an improvement constructed under this part 5 have been paid and canceled and for any reason any remaining assessments are not paid in time to pay the remaining bonds for the district and the interest due thereon, the municipality may pay, from legally available moneys, the bonds when due and the interest due thereon and reimburse itself by collecting the unpaid assessments due the district. All moneys collected from such assessments for any improvement shall be applied to the payment of the bonds issued until payment in full is made of all the bonds, both principal and interest, or to fund or replenish reserve accounts, if any, established to secure the payment of such bonds. The bonds may be used in payment of the cost of the improvement as specified; or the governing body, upon advertisement published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in such municipality and in such other newspapers as may be designated by the governing body, may sell a sufficient number of said bonds to pay such cost in cash for the best bid submitted in accordance with the terms of the notice of sale. All bids may be rejected at the discretion of the governing body. In addition, the bonds may be sold on such terms and conditions at a private sale if determined by the governing body to be in the best interests of the municipality.

When all bonds of a district have been paid, any moneys remaining to the credit of such district may be transferred to a special surplus and deficiency fund, and, whenever there is a deficiency in any improvement district bond fund to meet the payment of outstanding bonds for other improvement districts and interest due thereon or to redeem such outstanding bonds in accordance with any estimated redemption schedule used in connection with the sale of such bonds, the deficiency may be paid from the moneys available therefor in the surplus and deficiency fund.

In connection with the issuance of bonds payable solely from special assessments, the governing body of the municipality may provide by ordinance or resolution for the submission of the question of issuing such bonds to the electors eligible to vote on the question. The governing body of the municipality may provide by ordinance or resolution that all registered electors of the municipality shall be eligible to vote on the question or that only electors of the district shall be eligible to vote on the question.

In connection with the issuance of bonds payable from special assessments which are additionally secured by a pledge of any other funds of the municipality, including the surplus and deficiency fund, the governing body of the municipality may provide by ordinance or resolution for the submission of the question of issuing the bonds to all registered electors of the municipality.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part 5, bonds issued in accordance with the requirements of this section may be payable from the assessments levied in one or more improvement districts.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part 5, any district formed for the purpose of encouraging, accommodating, and financing improvements as authorized in section 31-25-502 (2) may be authorized to issue one or more series of bonds, and bonds of any such district may be payable from the assessments levied pursuant to one or more assessment ordinances.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1200, § 1, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1281, § 5, effective May 22.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1470, § 2, effective June 4.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1050, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(3) and (4) added, p. 1193, § 95, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(3) amended, p. 518, § 17, effective April 30.

L. 2002:

(1) amended and (5) added, p. 274, § 16, effective August 7.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 775, § 60, effective June 1.

L. 2008:

(1) amended and (6) added, p. 1305, § 33, effective May 27.

31-25-534.5. Issuing refunding bonds.

The governing body of a municipality may issue one or more series of bonds to refund all or any portion of the outstanding bonds issued by one or more improvement districts pursuant to section 31-25-534. Any such bonds shall be issued in accordance with the provisions of article 56 of title 11, C.R.S. In such case, for purposes of complying with the requirements of article 56 of title 11, C.R.S., any bonds issued to refund all or any portion of the outstanding bonds of one or more improvement districts shall be deemed to be revenue bonds, the refunded bonds shall be deemed to be revenue obligations, and the assessments shall be deemed to be revenue.

Any bonds issued pursuant to this section may refund all or any portion of the outstanding bonds of one or more improvement districts and may be secured by a combination of assessments levied on all or a specifically identified portion of the assessed property located within such districts.

Two or more series of bonds may be issued to refund the outstanding bonds of one or more districts, and each series may be secured by assessments levied on different portions of the assessed property located within the districts that have outstanding bonds.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) or (6) of this section, in connection with the issuance of refunding bonds pursuant to this section, the governing body may amend the ordinance imposing the assessment to modify all or any portion of the following terms describing the assessment as specified in the ordinance:

The rate of interest the governing body charges on unpaid installments;

Any penalty for prepayment of an assessment;

The principal balance due and owing on the assessment;

The dates upon which unpaid assessments are due;

The number of years over which unpaid assessments are due; or

Any other term specified in the ordinance as necessary to make the ordinance conform to the requirements of this section.

Before the governing body may amend the ordinance imposing the assessment to increase the amount of principal and interest due and owing under the assessment, the number of years over which unpaid assessments are due, or the amount of any unpaid assessments, the governing body shall:

Obtain consent in writing to the amendment to the ordinance from the owner of each tract of land that would be affected by the amendment; or

Set a place and time, not less than twenty days nor more than forty days after the date of such setting, for a hearing on the proposed amendment.

Thereupon, the clerk of the governing body shall cause notice by publication to be made of the pendency of the proposed amendment, a summary of the terms of such amendment as described in subsection (4) of this section, and of the time and place of the hearing on the proposed amendment.

All complaints and objections made in writing concerning the proposed amendment by the owners of any property in the district shall be heard and determined by the governing body before final action is taken. If the owners of the tracts upon which more than one-half of the affected assessments, measured by the unpaid assessment balance, submit written protests to the amendment to the governing body on or before the date specified in the notice, the governing body shall not adopt the proposed amendment. Any proposed amendment may be modified, confirmed, or rescinded prior to passage of the ordinance authorized under subsection (4) of this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in order either to issue refunding bonds or to amend an ordinance of the governing body imposing an assessment pursuant to this section, the governing body shall make written findings that:

The obligation of the municipality shall not be materially or adversely impaired with respect to any outstanding bond secured by the assessments; and

The principal balance of any assessment shall not increase to an amount such that the aggregate amount that is assessed against any one particular tract of land exceeds the maximum benefit to the tract that is estimated to result from the project that is financed by the assessment and refunding of the outstanding bonds.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 275, § 17, effective August 7.

31-25-535. Bonds negotiable - interest.

All such bonds shall be negotiable in form and bear interest as may be fixed by the governing body not exceeding a maximum net effective interest rate specified by the governing body prior to the use of said bonds in payment for improvements or the sale thereof pursuant to section 31-25-534.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1200, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1050, § 12, effective July 1.

31-25-536. Manner of redemption. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1200, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1057, § 24, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 278, § 22, effective August 7.

31-25-537. When mandamus will issue.

When any improvement authorized by this part 5 is petitioned for by the owners of property to be assessed for more than one-half of the entire costs estimated by the governing body to be assessed, it is the duty of the municipal officials whose duty it is to act to authorize said improvement, and an order in the nature of mandamus may issue out of any court of competent jurisdiction requiring said officials to take such action as is required by this part 5; but, if the material petitioned for is known to be worthless or of poor quality or would not make a good, substantial, and reasonable permanent improvement, the governing body may refuse to grant a petition for that reason. If a material petitioned for or designated in the specifications is a patented or proprietary article on which there can be but one bid, the governing body may refuse to award a contract if the entire bid is excessive as compared with improvements of equal value or may reject the bid or readvertise.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1200, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1052, § 15, effective July 1.

31-25-538. No action maintainable - exception - grounds - limitations.

No legal or equitable action shall be brought or maintained except to enjoin the collection of assessments levied under this part 5 upon the grounds:

That notice of a hearing upon the amount of the assessment was not given as required in this part 5. Any person presenting objections to the governing body at or before the hearing on assessment shall be deemed to have waived this ground.

That the hearing upon the amount of the assessment as provided in this part 5 was not held;

That the improvement ordered was not one authorized by this part 5;

That the assessment levied exceeds the benefits received by the property assessed.

No action shall be brought on the grounds provided in paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section unless a hearing on the proposed improvements is required pursuant to section 31-25-503 and unless the objections on which such action is based have been presented to the governing body in writing prior to or at such hearing. No action shall be brought on the grounds provided in paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of this section unless the objections on which such action is based have been presented to the governing body in writing prior to or at the hearing on the assessment roll. Any action brought with respect to the ordering of any improvements, the creation of any district, the authorization or issuance of any bonds, the levying of any assessments, or any other action taken under this part 5 shall be commenced within thirty days after the passage of the ordinance or resolution ordering the improvements, creating the district, authorizing or issuing bonds, or levying assessments or within thirty days after performance of any other action complained of or else shall be forever barred.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1201, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(2) amended, p. 1052, § 16, effective July 1.

31-25-539. Effect of court order.

If in any court of competent jurisdiction any final assessment made in pursuance of this part 5 is set aside or if the governing body determines it to be necessary to alter any final assessment made pursuant to this part 5, the governing body, upon notice as required in the making of an original assessment, may make a new assessment in accordance with the provisions of this part 5.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1201, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1474, § 11, effective October 1.

31-25-540. Figures instead of words - when general description used.

In all proceedings and notices authorized by this part 5, figures may be used instead of words, and in districts of extended areas it is not necessary to designate each piece of land separately. In such case general descriptions and quantities may be used, except in the assessment rolls. Except in such rolls, the cost may be stated as being of probable or certain amount per front foot or per square foot or per lot of given size.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1201, § 1, effective July 1.

31-25-541. Interim warrants.

The governing body, from time to time as work proceeds in a local improvement district, may authorize the issuance of interim warrants: For not to exceed ninety percent in value of the work theretofore done upon estimates of the engineer of the municipality; after completion of the work and acceptance thereof by the engineer of the municipality and by the governing body, for one hundred percent of the value of the work so completed; and, where improvements in the district require the acquisition of property, for an amount not exceeding the value of the property. The warrants may be issued to a contractor to apply at par value on the contract price for the improvements or to the owner of the property to apply at par value on the property price. The warrants may also be issued and sold at not less than par value in such manner as the governing body may determine, and the proceeds may be used to apply towards payment of the contract price and property price. Interim warrants shall bear interest from date of issue until paid at such rate as may be fixed by the governing body. Interest accruing on interim warrants shall be included as a cost of the improvements in the local improvement district. Interim warrants and interest thereon shall be paid by the issuance of or by proceeds from the sale of special improvement bonds issued or in cash received from the payment of assessments not pledged to the payment of the bonds or from any of such sources.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1470, § 3, effective June 4.

31-25-542. County treasurer - policies and procedures.

The county treasurer may adopt policies and procedures which the county treasurer deems necessary and reasonable for the administration and collection of assessments which are to be collected by the county treasurer and which are imposed and payable pursuant to the provisions of this part 5 or pursuant to any home rule charter and any ordinances adopted pursuant thereto; however, prior to adoption, copies of such proposed policies and procedures shall be delivered to all municipalities located in the county and, after giving notice to such municipalities, a public hearing shall be held by the county treasurer on such proposed policies and procedures.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 1474, § 12, effective October 1.